test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-chweyo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - chweyo: # Verb 'to create' - full paradigm
     chweyo+V+Inf: chweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: nachweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: nichweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: nochweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: newachweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: neuchweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: negichweyo

#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg1: nichweya
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg1: nochweya
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg1: neuchweya
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg1: negichweya
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg2: nachweyi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg2: nochweyi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg2: newachweyi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg2: negichweyi
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg3: nachweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg3: nichweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg3: nochweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg3: newachweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg3: neuchweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg3: negichweye
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl1: nachwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl1: nichwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl1: nochwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl1: neuchwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl1: negichwewa
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl2: [nachweu, nachweyou]
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl2: [nochweu, nochweyou]
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl2: [newachweu, newachweyou]
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl2: [negichweu, negichweyou]
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl3: nachweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl3: nichweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl3: nochweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl3: newachweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl3: neuchweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl3: negichweyogi

#  reflexive
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+RcSg1: nachwera
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+RcSg2: nichweri
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+RcSg3: nochwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+RcPl1: newachwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+RcPl2: nichwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+RcPl2: neuchwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+RcPl3: negichwere

## i- present continuative

     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg1: achweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg2: ichweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg3: ochweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl1: wachweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl2: uchweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl3: gichweyo

#
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg2+OcSg1: ichweya
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg3+OcSg1: ochweya
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl2+OcSg1: uchweya
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl3+OcSg1: gichweya
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg1+OcSg2: achweyi
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg3+OcSg2: ochweyi
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl1+OcSg2: wachweyi
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl3+OcSg2: gichweyi
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg1+OcSg3: achweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg2+OcSg3: ichweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg3+OcSg3: ochweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl1+OcSg3: wachweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl2+OcSg3: uchweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl3+OcSg3: gichweye
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg1+OcPl1: achwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg2+OcPl1: ichwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg3+OcPl1: ochwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl2+OcPl1: uchwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl3+OcPl1: gichwewa
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg1+OcPl2: [achweu, chweyou]
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg3+OcPl2: [ochweu, ochweyou]
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl1+OcPl2: [wachweu, wachweyou]
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl3+OcPl2: [gichweu, gichweyou]
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg1+OcPl3: achweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg2+OcPl3: ichweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg3+OcPl3: ochweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl1+OcPl3: wachweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl2+OcPl3: uchweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl3+OcPl3: gichweyogi

#  reflexive
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg1+RcSg1: achwera
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg2+RcSg2: ichweri
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg3+RcSg3: ochwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl1+RcPl1: wachwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg2+RcPl2: ichwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl2+RcPl2: uchwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl3+RcPl3: gichwere

##ibro- future

     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1: abrochweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2: ibrochweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3: obrochweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1: wabrochweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2: ubrochweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3: gibrochweyo

#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2+OcSg1: ibrochweya
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcSg1: obrochweya
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2+OcSg1: ubrochweya
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcSg1: gibrochweya
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+OcSg2: abrochweyi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcSg2: obrochweyi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1+OcSg2: wabrochweyi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcSg2: gibrochweyi
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+OcSg3: abrochweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2+OcSg3: ibrochweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcSg3: obrochweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1+OcSg3: wabrochweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2+OcSg3: ubrochweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcSg3: gibrochweye
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+OcPl1: abrochwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2+OcPl1: ibrochwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcPl1: obrochwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2+OcPl1: ubrochwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcPl1: gibrochwewa
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+OcPl2: [abrochweu, abrochweyou]
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcPl2: [obrochweu, obrochweyou]
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1+OcPl2: [wabrochweu, wabrochweyou]
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcPl2: [gibrochweu, gibrochweyou]
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+OcPl3: abrochweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2+OcPl3: ibrochweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcPl3: obrochweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1+OcPl3: wabrochweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2+OcPl3: ubrochweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcPl3: gibrochweyogi

#  reflexive
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+RcSg1: abrochwera
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2+RcSg2: ibrochweri
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+RcSg3: obrochwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1+RcPl1: wabrochwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2+RcPl2: ibrochwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2+RcPl2: ubrochwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+RcPl3: gibrochwere

## CONDITION

     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg1: kachweyo
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg2: kichweyo
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg3: kochweyo
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl1: kawachweyo
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl2: kauchweyo
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl3: kagichweyo

#
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg1: kichweya
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg1: kochweya
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg1: kauchweya
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg1: kagichweya
#
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg2: kachweyi
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg2: kochweyi
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg2: kawachweyi
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg2: kagichweyi
#
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg3: kachweye
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg3: kichweye
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg3: kochweye
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg3: kawachweye
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg3: kauchweye
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg3: kagichweye
#
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl1: kachwewa
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl1: kichwewa
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl1: kochwewa
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl1: kauchwewa
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl1: kagichwewa
#
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl2: [kachweu, kachweyou]
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl2: [kochweu, kochweyou]
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl2: [kawachweu, kawachweyou]
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl2: [kagichweu, kagichweyou]
#
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl3: kachweyogi
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl3: kichweyogi
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl3: kochweyogi
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl3: kawachweyogi
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl3: kauchweyogi
     chweyo+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl3: kagichweyogi

#  reflexive
     chweyo+V+Ind+Cond+ScSg1+RcSg1: kachwera
     chweyo+V+Ind+Cond+ScSg2+RcSg2: kichweri
     chweyo+V+Ind+Cond+ScSg3+RcSg3: kochwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Cond+ScPl1+RcPl1: kawachwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Cond+ScSg2+RcPl2: kichwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Cond+ScPl2+RcPl2: kauchwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Cond+ScPl3+RcPl3: kagichwere

# Preterite 2
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1: nasechweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2: nisechweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3: nosechweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1: newasechweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2: neusechweyo
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3: negisechweyo

#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1: nisechweya
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1: nosechweya
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1: neusechweya
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1: negisechweya
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2: nasechweyi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2: nosechweyi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2: newasechweyi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2: negisechweyi
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3: nasechweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3: nisechweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3: nosechweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3: newasechweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3: neusechweye
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3: negisechweye
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl1: nasechwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1: nisechwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1: nosechwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1: neusechwewa
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1: negisechwewa
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2: [nasechweu, nasechweyou]
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2: [nosechweu, nosechweyou]
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2: [newasechweu, newasechweyou]
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2: [negisechweu, negisechweyou]
#
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3: nasechweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3: nisechweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3: nosechweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3: newasechweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3: neusechweyogi
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3: negisechweyogi

#  reflexive
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+RcSg1: nasechwera
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+RcSg2: nisechweri
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+RcSg3: nosechwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+RcPl1: newasechwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+RcPl2: nisechwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+RcPl2: neusechwere
     chweyo+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+RcPl3: negisechwere
